Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3296.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 36-10.1-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-10.1 entitled "Rhode
Island Public Employee Pension Revocation and Reduction Act" is hereby amended to read as
follows:
36-10.1-2. Definitions.
(a) “Crime related to public office or public employment” shall mean any of the following
criminal offenses:
(1) The committing, aiding, or abetting of an embezzlement of public funds;
(2) The committing, aiding, or abetting of any felonious theft by a public officer or
employee from his or her employer;
(3) Bribery in connection with employment of a public officer or employee; and
(4) The committing of any felony by a public officer or employee who, willfully and with
the intent to defraud the public or the public agency for which the public officer or employee acts,
or in which they are employed, of the right to receive the faithful performance of their duty as a
public officer or employee, realizes or obtains, or attempts to realize or obtain, a monetary or
nonmonetary profit, gain, or advantage for himself or herself or for some other person through the
use or attempted use of the power, rights, privileges, duties, or position of his or her public office
or employment position; or
(5) The committing on or after July 1, 2026, of any felony under chapter 37 of title 11 by

a public officer or employee through the use or attempted use of power, rights, privileges, duties,
or position of their public office or employment position.
(b) “Public official” or “public employee” shall mean any current or former state or
municipal elected official as defined in § 36-14-2(10), state or municipal appointed official as
defined in § 36-14-2(4), and any employee of state or local government, of boards, commissions
or agencies as defined in § 36-14-2(8)(i), (ii), who is otherwise entitled to receive or who is
receiving retirement benefits under this title, under title 16, under title 45, under title 8, under
chapter 30 of title 28, under chapter 43 of title 31, or under chapter 28 of title 42, whether that
person is acting on a permanent or temporary basis and whether or not compensated on a full-time
or part-time basis. For the purposes of this chapter, all these persons are deemed to be engaged in
public employment.
(c) As used in this chapter, the phrase “pleads guilty or nolo contendere” shall not include
any plea of nolo contendere which does not constitute a conviction by virtue of § 12-10-12 or 12-
18-3.
(d) For purposes of this chapter, “domestic partner” shall be defined as a person who, prior
to the decedent’s death, was in an exclusive, intimate and committed relationship with the decedent,
and who certifies by affidavit that their relationship met the following qualifications:
(1) Both partners were at least eighteen (18) years of age and were mentally competent to
contract;
(2) Neither partner was married to anyone else;
(3) Partners were not related by blood to a degree which would prohibit marriage in the
state of Rhode Island;
(4) Partners resided together and had resided together for at least one year at the time of
death; and
(5) Partners were financially interdependent as evidenced by at least two (2) of the
following:
(i) Domestic partnership agreement or relationship contract;
(ii) Joint mortgage or joint ownership of primary residence;
(iii) Two (2) of: (A) joint ownership of motor vehicle; (B) joint checking account; (C) joint
credit account; (D) joint lease; and/or
(iv) The domestic partner had been designated as a beneficiary for the decedent’s will,
retirement contract or life insurance.
LC006441 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006441
========
LC006441 - Page 3 of 4